Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.56.400

Theft from a vulnerable adult in the first degree—Theft from a vulnerable adult in the second degree.

(1)(a) A person is guilty of theft from a vulnerable adult in the first degree if he or she commits theft of property or services that exceed(s) five thousand dollars in value, other than a firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010, of a vulnerable adult. The defendant must have known or should have known that the victim was a vulnerable adult.

(b) Theft from a vulnerable adult in the first degree is a class B felony.

(2)(a) A person is guilty of theft from a vulnerable adult in the second degree if he or she commits theft of property or services that exceed(s) seven hundred fifty dollars in value but does not exceed five thousand dollars in value, other than a firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010 or a motor vehicle, of a vulnerable adult. The defendant must have known or should have known that the victim was a vulnerable adult.

(b) Theft from a vulnerable adult in the second degree is a class C felony.

[ 2017 c 266 s 6.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2017 c 266: See note following RCW 9A.42.020.